Hawaii statutes.
§54-28 Agreement for joint use of
utilities. The board of water supply may enter into such arrangements and
agreements as it deems proper for the joint use with any other person owning
the same, or having jurisdiction of the same, of poles, conduits, towers,
stations, aqueducts, and reservoirs for the operation of any of the properties
under its jurisdiction. [L 1961, c 155, pt of §1; Supp, §145A-18; HRS §54-28]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next